Utah statutes.
23-17-9.   Training of dogs -- Use of protected or privately owned wildlife.
The Wildlife Board may authorize the use of protected wildlife or privately
owned wildlife for the training of dogs within the state of Utah under rules
and regulations it may promulgate.
